Florida, session 2026, HB1513.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (136) is added to section 320.08058,
Florida Statutes, to read:
320.08058 Specialty license plates.—
(136) ITALIAN-AMERICAN CULTURE LICENSE PLATES.—
(a) The department shall develop an Italian-American
culture license plate as provided in this section and s.
320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved by
the department. The word "Florida" must appear at the top of the
plate, and the words "Italian Heritage" must appear at the
bottom of the plate.
(b) The annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be
distributed to Il Circola, Inc., a nonprofit corporation under
s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which may use up to
10 percent of the fees for administrative costs and marketing of
the plate. Il Circola, Inc., must use the remainder of the fees
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1513-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1513 2026
to support its mission of promoting an awareness and
appreciation of Italian culture, arts, and language for people
of all ethnic backgrounds.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1513-00